Maine, session 132, LD735.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §373 is enacted to read:
§373. Land development legislation in conflict with United States Environmental
Protection Agency regulations
Any legislation proposing to enact a measure regarding the development of land that is
in conflict with United States Environmental Protection Agency regulations may be:
1. Sponsorship. Sponsored only by a member of the House of Representatives or
Senate who represents the district affected by the legislation; and
2. Two-thirds vote. Enacted only with a 2/3 vote of the Legislature.
Sec. 2. PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. YYY, §2 is repealed.
Sec. 3. PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. YYY, §3 is repealed.
Sec. 4. Land development on Sears Island in Town of Searsport. The
Department of Transportation, the Department of Environmental Protection, any other state
agency or the Governor may not authorize any land development on Sears Island in the
Town of Searsport without the Governor first establishing an indigenous lands protection
committee and obtaining from that committee a certification that any area to be developed
on Sears Island does not contain a site sacred to indigenous people in Maine. The
committee must be composed of one representative of the Governor and 5 representatives,
one each selected by the tribal government of the following:
1. The Mi'kmaq Nation;
2. The Houlton Band of Maliseet Indians;
3. The Passamaquoddy Tribe at Motahkomikuk;
4. The Passamaquoddy Tribe at Sipayik; and
5. The Penobscot Nation.